Louisiana, session 2026, SB118.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The introductory paragraph of R.S. 14:98.1(A)(1) and (A)(1)(b) and the
introductory paragraph of 98.2(A)(1) and (A)(1)(b) are hereby amended and reenacted and
R.S. 14:98.1(D) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§98.1. Operating while impaired; first offense; penalties
A.(1) Except as modified by the provisions of Paragraphs (2) and (3) of this
Subsection, on a conviction of a first offense violation of R.S. 14:98, the offender
shall be fined not less than three hundred dollars nor more than one thousand dollars,
and shall be imprisoned for not less than ten days nor more than six months.
Imposition or execution of sentence under this Paragraph shall not be suspended
unless the offender is placed on probation with the minimum conditions that he
complete all of the following:
* * *
(b) Participate in a court-approved substance abuse program, which may
shall include a screening to determine if the offender is at risk for a substance
use disorder.
(i) The screening tool shall be evidence-based and validated specifically
for the impaired driving population.
(ii) The findings of the screening shall be confidential and shall be
reported directly to the court, the prosecuting attorney, and counsel for the
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 118 ENROLLED
defendant.
(iii) If the substance use disorder screening indicates that the offender
is at risk of having a substance use disorder, the court may order an assessment
be performed by a licensed clinician to determine if the offender has a diagnosis of
substance abuse use disorder.
(iv) Nothing herein in this Section shall prohibit the court from modifying
the portions of the substance abuse program as may be applicable and appropriate
to an individual offender as shown by the assessment.
* * *
D. This Section and R.S. 14:98.2 shall be known and may be cited as the
"Judge Jules Edwards, III Impaired Driving Prevention Act ".
§98.2. Operating while impaired; second offense; penalties
A.(1) Except as modified by the provisions of Paragraphs (2), (3), and (4) of
this Subsection, or as provided by Subsection D of this Section, on a conviction of
a second offense violation of R.S. 14:98, regardless of whether the second offense
occurred before or after the first conviction, the offender shall be fined not less than
seven hundred fifty dollars nor more than one thousand dollars, and shall be
imprisoned for not less than thirty days nor more than six months. At least forty-
eight hours of the sentence imposed shall be served without benefit of parole,
probation, or suspension of sentence. Imposition or execution of the remainder of
sentence shall not be suspended unless the offender is placed on probation with the
minimum conditions that he complete all of the following:
* * *
(b) Participate in a court-approved substance abuse program, which may
shall include a screening to determine if the offender is at risk for a substance
use disorder.
(i) The screening tool shall be evidence-based and validated specifically
for the impaired driving population.
(ii) The findings of the screening shall be confidential and shall be
reported directly to the court, the prosecuting attorney, and counsel for the
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 118 ENROLLED
defendant.
(iii) If the substance use disorder screening indicates that the offender
is at risk of having a substance use disorder, the court may order an assessment
be performed by a licensed clinician to determine if the offender has a diagnosis of
substance abuse use disorder.
(iv) Nothing in this Section shall prohibit the court from modifying the
portions of the substance abuse program as may be applicable and appropriate to
an individual offender as shown by the assessment.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.